North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 1. Apportionment of Members; Compensation and Allowances.
§ 120-2.1.
Severability of Senate and House apportionment acts.

If any provision of any act of the General Assembly that apportions Senate or House districts is held invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions that can be given effect without the invalid provision; and to this end the provisions of any said act are severable.

History.

1981, c. 771, s. 1.

§ 120-2.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-343, s. 1, effective July 23, 2013.

History.

1995, c. 355, s. 1; c. 509, s. 135.2(h); Repealed by G.S. 120-30.9J, Session Laws 2013-343, s. 1, effective July 23, 2013.

§ 120-2.3.
Contents of judgments invalidating apportionment or redistricting acts.

Every order or judgment declaring unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, in whole or in part and for any reason, any act of the General Assembly that apportions or redistricts State legislative or congressional districts shall find with specificity all facts supporting that declaration, shall state separately and with specificity the court’s conclusions of law on that declaration, and shall, with specific reference to those findings of fact and conclusions of law, identify every defect found by the court, both as to the plan as a whole and as to individual districts.

History.

2003-434, 1st Ex. Sess., s. 8.

§ 120-2.4.
Opportunity for General Assembly to remedy defects.

If the General Assembly enacts a plan apportioning or redistricting State legislative or congressional districts, in no event may a court impose its own substitute plan unless the court first gives the General Assembly a period of time to remedy any defects identified by the court in its findings of fact and conclusions of law. That period of time shall not be less than two weeks, provided, however, that if the General Assembly is scheduled to convene legislative session within 45 days of the date of the court order that period of time shall not be less than two weeks from the convening of that legislative session.

(a1)

In the event the General Assembly does not act to remedy any identified defects to its plan within that period of time, the court may impose an interim districting plan for use in the next general election only, but that interim districting plan may differ from the districting plan enacted by the General Assembly only to the extent necessary to remedy any defects identified by the court.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or authority of the State Board of Elections under Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, the State Board of Elections shall have no authority to alter, amend, correct, impose, or substitute any plan apportioning or redistricting State legislative or congressional districts other than a plan imposed by a court under this section or a plan enacted by the General Assembly.

History.

2003-434, 1st Ex. Sess., s. 9; 2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 20(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 4.7, 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor substituted “Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement” for “State Board of Elections” twice in subsection (b); and substituted “Subchapter III of Chapter 163A” for “Chapter 163” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b) and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subsection (b).

§ 120-2.5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-125, s. 22(f), effective December 16, 2016.

History.

2003-434, 1st Ex. Sess., s. 10.

§ 120-3.
Pay of members and officers of the General Assembly.

The Speaker of the House shall be paid an annual salary of thirty-eight thousand one hundred fifty-one dollars ($38,151) payable monthly, and an expense allowance of one thousand four hundred thirteen dollars ($1,413) per month. The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall be paid an annual salary of thirty-eight thousand one hundred fifty-one dollars ($38,151) payable monthly, and an expense allowance of one thousand four hundred thirteen dollars ($1,413) per month. The Speaker Pro Tempore of the House shall be paid an annual salary of twenty-one thousand seven hundred thirty-nine dollars ($21,739) payable monthly, and an expense allowance of eight hundred thirty-six dollars ($836.00) per month. The Deputy President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall be paid an annual salary of twenty-one thousand seven hundred thirty-nine dollars ($21,739) payable monthly, and an expense allowance of eight hundred thirty-six dollars ($836.00) per month. The majority and minority leaders in the House and the majority and minority leaders in the Senate shall be paid an annual salary of seventeen thousand forty-eight dollars ($17,048) payable monthly, and an expense allowance of six hundred sixty-six dollars ($666.00) per month.

Every other member of the General Assembly shall receive increases in annual salary only to the extent of and in the amounts equal to the average increases received by employees of the State, effective upon convening of the next Regular Session of the General Assembly after enactment of these increased amounts, except no such increase is granted upon the convening of the 1997 Regular Session of the General Assembly. Accordingly, upon convening of the 1997 Regular Session of the General Assembly, every other member of the General Assembly shall be paid an annual salary of thirteen thousand nine hundred fifty-one dollars ($13,951) payable monthly, and an expense allowance of five hundred fifty-nine dollars ($559.00) per month.

The salary and expense allowances provided in this section are in addition to any per diem compensation and any subsistence and travel allowance authorized by any other law with respect to any regular or extra session of the General Assembly, and service on any State board, agency, commission, standing committee and study commission.

History.

1929, c. 2, s. 1; 1951, c. 23, s. 1; 1965, c. 917; c. 1157, s. 1; 1967, c. 1120; 1969, c. 1278, s. 1; 1971, c. 1200, s. 5; 1973, c. 1482, s. 1; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1249, ss. 1, 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1137, s. 9.1; 1983, c. 761, s. 203; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 209; 1985, c. 479, s. 208; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 29; 1987, c. 738, s. 15; c. 830, s. 70; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, s. 9; 1989, c. 752, s. 26; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 35; 1993, c. 321, s. 52; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.5; 1995, c. 507, s. 7.8; 2002-159, s. 39.

§ 120-3.1.
Subsistence and travel allowances for members of the General Assembly.

In addition to compensation for their services, members of the General Assembly shall be paid the following allowances:

A weekly travel allowance for each week or fraction thereof that the General Assembly is in regular or extra session. The amount of the weekly travel allowance shall be calculated for each member by multiplying the actual round-trip mileage from that member’s home to the City of Raleigh by the rate per mile which is the business standard mileage rate set by the Internal Revenue Service in Rev. Proc. 93-51, December 27, 1993.

A travel allowance at the rate which is the business standard mileage rate set by the Internal Revenue Service in Rev. Proc. 93-51, December 27, 1993, whenever the member travels, whether in or out of session, as a representative of the General Assembly or of its committees or commissions, with the approval of the Legislative Services Commission.

A subsistence allowance for meals and lodging at a daily rate equal to the maximum per diem rate for federal employees traveling to Raleigh, North Carolina, as set out at 58 Federal Register 67959 (December 22, 1993), while the General Assembly is in session and, except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, while the General Assembly is not in session when, with the approval of the Speaker of the House of Representatives in the case of Representatives or the President Pro Tempore of the Senate in case of Senators, the member is:

Traveling as a representative of the General Assembly or of its committees or commissions, or

Otherwise in the service of the State.A member who is authorized to travel, whether in or out of session, within the United States outside North Carolina, may elect to receive, in lieu of the amount provided in the preceding paragraph, a subsistence allowance of twenty-six dollars ($26.00) a day for meals, plus actual expenses for lodging when evidenced by a receipt satisfactory to the Legislative Services Officer, the latter not to exceed the maximum per diem rate for federal employees traveling to the same place, as set out at 58 Federal Register 67950-67964 (December 22, 1993) and at 59 Federal Register 23702-23709 (May 6, 1994).

A member may be reimbursed for registration fees as permitted by the Legislative Services Commission.

Payment of travel and subsistence allowances shall be made to members of the General Assembly only after certification by the claimant as to the correctness thereof on forms prescribed by the Legislative Services Commission. Claims for travel and subsistence payments shall be paid at such times as may be prescribed by the Legislative Services Commission.

When the General Assembly by joint action of the two houses adjourns to a day certain, which day is more than three days after the date of adjournment, the period between the date of adjournment and the date of reconvening shall for the purposes of this section be deemed to be a period when the General Assembly is not in session, and no member shall be entitled to subsistence and travel allowance during that period, except under circumstances which would entitle him to subsistence and travel allowance when the General Assembly is not in session.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989 (Regular Session 1990), c. 1066, s. 24(a).

History.

1957, c. 8; 1959, c. 939; 1961, c. 889; 1965, c. 86, s. 1; 1969, c. 1257, s. 1; 1971, c. 1200, ss. 1-4; 1973, c. 1482, s. 2; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1249, ss. 3, 4; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1137, s. 30; 1983, c. 761, ss. 25, 26; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, ss. 184, 186; 1985, c. 479, s. 206; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 40(a); 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, s. 30(c); 1989, c. 117; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1066, s. 24(a); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 51; 1993, c. 321, ss. 24(b), (c); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.28; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 8(b).

Cross References.

As to the time of the convening of the Regular Session of the Senate and House of Representatives, see

G.S. 120-11.1

.

§ 120-4.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 40(b).

§ 120-4.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1482, s. 3.

§ 120-4.2.
Repeal of Legislative Retirement Fund.

Effective as of the end of the term of the members of the 1973 General Assembly,

G.S. 120-4.1

is repealed, subject to the following provisions to preserve vested and inchoate rights in the Legislative Retirement Fund:

All persons who have at least four terms of creditable service as of the end of the 1973 term shall be entitled to receive the retirement benefits provided under

G.S. 120-4.1

as it existed prior to this repealing act, but no credit shall be given for any service performed after the end of the 1973 term.

Solely for purposes of administering the benefits authorized by

G.S. 120-3

to 120-4.2, the authority and duties created by

G.S. 120-4.1

as it existed prior to this repealing act shall continue in effect, except that the General Assembly may opt to make annual transfers instead of quarterly transfers of funds to the Department of State Treasurer.

History.

1973, c. 1482, s. 3; 2014-97, s. 7.

§§ 120-4.3 through 120-4.7.

Reserved for future codification purposes.